Connecticut, session 2026, HB05210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 36a-44a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Data security incident" means any unauthorized access to or
unauthorized acquisition, destruction or corruption of electronic files,
media, databases or computerized data containing (A) personal
information of an individual, or (B) supervisory, financial, operational
or business information of any (i) licensee under this title, (ii)
Connecticut bank, or (iii) Connecticut credit union;
(2) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as provided in
Section 509 of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Modernization Act of
1999, 15 USC 6809, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, as said
act and such regulations may be amended from time to time; and
(3) "Personal information" has the same meaning as provided in
section 36a-701b.
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5210
(b) Each financial institution that is a bank, a Connecticut credit
union, a federal credit union, an out-of-state bank that maintains a
branch in this state, an out-of-state trust company or out-of-state credit
union that maintains an office in this state [,] or a licensee under this
title, [or any] and each person subject to the jurisdiction of the
commissioner under title 36b, shall (1) adopt, in writing, a program
setting forth standards for developing, implementing and maintaining
reasonable data security safeguards to protect the security,
confidentiality and integrity of customer information, and (2) comply
with all provisions of Subtitle A of Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley
Financial Modernization Act of 1999, 15 USC 6801 et seq., and the
regulations promulgated thereunder that apply to such financial
institution [, except to] or person, including, but not limited to, the
applicable provisions of 12 CFR Part 364, Appendix B, 12 CFR Part 748,
Appendix A and 16 CFR Part 314, as said act and such regulations may
be amended from time to time. To the extent that this [section]
subsection is inconsistent with the provisions of sections 36a-41 to 36a-
44, inclusive, [in which case] the provisions that afford the customer
greater protection shall control. [For purposes of this section, "financial
institution" has the meaning given to that term in Section 509 of the
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Modernization Act of 1999, 15 USC 6809,
and the regulations promulgated thereunder.]
(c) Each licensee under this title, Connecticut bank and Connecticut
credit union shall file a notification with the Department of Banking, in
a form and manner prescribed by the Banking Commissioner, not later
than three business days after such licensee, Connecticut bank or
Connecticut credit union knows, or has reason to know, of the
occurrence of any data security incident that may (1) materially impact
its ability to operate in a safe and sound manner or comply with
applicable laws and regulations, (2) cause significant disruption in
customer services, or (3) involve any unauthorized access to the
personal information of any individual.
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5210
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 36a-44a
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3